District of Columbia statutes.
26-1322

Liability of stockholders.

All stockholders of every company incorporated under this chapter, or availing itself of its provisions under § 26-1313 shall be severally and individually liable to the creditors of such company to an amount equal to and in addition to the amount of stock held by them respectively for all debts and contracts made by such company.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1307, ch. 854, § 734
This section is referenced in § 26-105.
1981 Ed., § 26-422.
1973 Ed., § 26-322.